Washington statutes.
RCW 36.95.070

District board—Reimbursement of members for expenses.

Members of the board shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be reimbursed from district funds for any actual and necessary expenses incurred by them in the performance of their official duties.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 155 s 7.]